Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 310.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 310.18 Partial payments during construction. Partial payments may be made on work in progress, but no such partial payment shall not be deemed final acceptance of the work nor a waiver of any defect in the work. The board of supervisors, the county engineer, or the department may approve partial and final claims. Approval may be evidenced by the signature of the county engineer or chairperson of the board or department, or a majority of the members of the board or House File 903, p. 2 department, on the individual claims or on the abstract of a number of claims with the individual claims attached to the abstract. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 903, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor